Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3514
Organization, defined.

Organization includes a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other form of business entity that is authorized to do business in this state.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 62;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 13.